Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 1.1
PEOPLE SERVICE TRANSPORTATION

Section

40-1.1-101. Legislative declaration.

In order to promote improved transportation for the elderly, for persons with disabilities, and for the residents of rural areas and small towns through an expanded and coordinated transportation network, the general assembly hereby declares it to be the policy of the state to legally define and to recognize people service transportation and volunteer transportation as separate but contributing components of the transportation system. Therefore, it is the policy of the state to remove barriers to low-cost people service transportation and volunteer transportation. For this purpose, transportation systems meeting the criteria prescribed in this article will not be classified as public utilities or as any form of carrier subject to regulation by the commission but as people service transportation and volunteer transportation subject to appropriate regulation and administration.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1907, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1671, § 89, effective July 1.

40-1.1-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Charitable organization" means any charitable unit primarily supported by private donation and not for profit, including but not limited to churches, civic groups, clubs, scout troops, or the American red cross.

"Nonprofit" as applied to people service transportation or volunteer transportation means motor vehicle transportation provided for purposes other than for pecuniary gain, whether or not compensation is paid in connection with such transportation.

"People service agency" means any people service unit primarily supported by public funds and not for profit, such as clinics, day care centers, job programs, congregate meal centers, senior citizen programs, and other government funded bodies.

"People service organization" means a people service agency or a charitable organization.

"People service transportation" means motor vehicle transportation provided on a nonprofit basis by a people service organization generally for the purpose of transporting clients or program beneficiaries in connection with people service programs sponsored by the organization, or by another people service organization. The motor vehicle may be owned, leased, borrowed, or contracted for use by the people service organization.

"Volunteer transportation" means motor vehicle transportation provided on a nonprofit basis by an individual, company, firm, partnership, agency, or corporation under the direction, sponsorship, or supervision of a people service organization. The volunteers may receive an allowance to defray the expected cost of operating the vehicle but may not receive compensation for their time.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1907, § 1, effective July 1.

40-1.1-103. Classification of transportation.

People service transportation and volunteer transportation, as defined in section 40-1.1-102, shall be classified as such for purposes of regulation, insurance, and general administration.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1908, § 1, effective July 1.

40-1.1-104. Inapplicable laws and regulations.

People service transportation and volunteer transportation shall not be considered transportation for compensation, commercial transportation, or any form of carrier. Thus, the following laws and regulations do not apply to motor vehicles while being used for the purpose of people service transportation or volunteer transportation:

Articles 1 and 2 to 9 of this title, concerning public utilities and common carriers;

Article 10.1 of this title, concerning motor carriers; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 419, § 13, effective August 10, 2011.)

Articles 20 to 33 of this title, concerning railroads.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1908, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 419, § 13, effective August 10.

40-1.1-105. Insurance for volunteers.

People service agencies of the state or any political subdivision thereof are authorized to purchase insurance to cover volunteers when they provide volunteer transportation.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1908, § 1, effective July 1.

40-1.1-106. Safety and insurance regulation.

The provisions of parts 2, 3, and 5 of article 4 of title 42, C.R.S., shall be applicable to motor vehicles used in people service transportation or volunteer transportation.

Before a motor vehicle designed to transport more than sixteen passengers and used in people service transportation or volunteer transportation is operated or permitted to operate on any public highway of this state, the owner of such vehicle shall file with the department of revenue a certificate, in a form as approved by said department, evidencing a motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued by an insurance carrier or insurer authorized to do business in the state of Colorado or a surety bond issued by a company authorized to do a surety business in the state of Colorado with a minimum sum of fifty thousand dollars for damages to property of others, a minimum sum of one hundred thousand dollars for damages for or on account of bodily injury or death of one person as a result of any one accident, and, subject to such limit as to one person, a minimum sum of three hundred thousand dollars for or on account of bodily injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one accident.

Any state agency which provides public funds to a people service agency may establish insurance and safety requirements which are in addition to and consistent with any other applicable insurance and safety requirements and which shall apply to people service transportation or volunteer transportation which it funds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1908, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2570, § 92, effective January 1, 1995.